Illinois, session 104th, HB1480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Article 21.4 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/Art. 21.4 heading new)7ARTICLE 21.4. CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROTECTION LAW 8    (720 ILCS 5/21.4-1 new)9    Sec. 21.4-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as 10Critical Infrastructure Protection Law. 11    (720 ILCS 5/21.4-2 new)12    Sec. 21.4-2. Definitions. In this Article:13    "Critical infrastructure facility" means one of the 14following:15        (1) a petroleum or alumina refinery;16        (2) an electrical power generating facility, 17    substation, switching station, electrical control center, 18    or electric power lines and associated equipment 19    infrastructure;20        (3) a chemical, polymer or rubber manufacturing 21    facility;  HB1480- 2 -LRB104 03492 RLC 13515 b1        (4) a water intake structure, water treatment 2    facility, wastewater treatment plant, or pump station;3        (5) a natural gas compressor station;4        (6) a liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility;5        (7) wireline and wireless communications 6    infrastructure;7        (8) a port, railroad switching yard, trucking 8    terminal, or other freight transportation facility;9        (9) a gas processing plant, including a plant used in 10    the processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas 11    or natural gas liquids;12        (10) a transmission facility used by a federally 13    licensed radio or television station;14        (11) a steelmaking facility that uses an electric arc 15    furnace to make steel;16        (12) a facility identified and regulated by the United 17    States Department of Homeland Security Chemical Facility 18    Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS) program;19        (13) a dam that is regulated by the State or federal 20    government;21        (14) a natural gas distribution utility facility, 22    including, but not limited to, pipeline interconnections, 23    a city gate or town border station, metering station, 24    below-or above-ground pipeline or piping and truck loading 25    or offloading facility, a natural gas storage facility, a 26    natural gas transmission facility, or a natural gas   HB1480- 3 -LRB104 03492 RLC 13515 b1    utility distribution facility;2        (15) a crude oil or refined products storage and 3    distribution facility, including, but not limited to, a 4    valve site, pipeline interconnection, pump station, 5    metering station, below-or above-ground pipeline or 6    piping, and truck loading or offloading facility;7        (16) a military facility, including a national guard 8    facility and equipment storage area where non-military 9    personnel are prohibited;10        (17) a Department of Transportation facility and a 11    location near or on a roads or highway where the public is 12    prohibited;13        (18) a health care facility;14        (19) any above-ground portion of an oil, gas, 15    hazardous liquid or chemical pipeline, tank, or other 16    storage facility that is enclosed by a fence, other 17    physical barrier, or is clearly marked with signs 18    prohibiting trespassing, that are obviously designed to 19    exclude intruders; or20        (20) a commercial service airport as defined by the 21    Federal Aviation Administration. 22    (720 ILCS 5/21.4-3 new)23    Sec. 21.4-3. Criminal offenses; conspiracy; receipt of 24stolen property; felonies; misdemeanors; fines; imprisonment. 25    (a) Any person who knowingly damages, destroys,   HB1480- 4 -LRB104 03492 RLC 13515 b1vandalizes, defaces, tampers with, or steals equipment or 2assets of or in a critical infrastructure facility (including 3copper or other valuable metal) is guilty of a Class 4 felony 4if the value of the property is under $500, a Class 3 felony if 5the value of the property is between $500 and $10,000, and a 6Class 2 felony if the value of the property exceeds $10,000 7and, upon conviction for the offense, shall be fined not less 8than $5,000 nor more than $20,000.9    (b) Any person who conspires with any person to violate 10this Article is guilty of a Class 3 felony and, upon conviction 11for the offense, shall be fined not less than $5,000 nor more 12than $10,000.13    (c) Any person who receives stolen property, including 14copper or other valuable metal, who knows or has reason to know 15that it has been stolen from a critical infrastructure 16facility, is guilty of a Class 4 felony if the value of the 17property is under $500, a Class 3 felony if the value of the 18property is between $500 and $10,000, and a Class 2 felony for 19any amount over $10,000 and, upon conviction for the offense, 20shall be fined not less than $5,000 nor more than $10,000. 21    (720 ILCS 5/21.4-5 new)22    Sec. 21.4-5. Civil liability. 23    (a) Any person who violates this Article is liable to the 24owner of the property for compensatory damages and, in 25addition, for punitive damages in an amount not less than 3   HB1480- 5 -LRB104 03492 RLC 13515 b1times the amount of the compensatory damages.2    (b) Any person or entity that compensates, provides 3consideration to, or remunerates a person for property stolen 4in violation of this Article is liable to the owner of the 5property for compensatory damages and, in addition, for 6punitive damages in an amount not less than 3 times the amount 7of the compensatory damages. It is an affirmative defense to 8this subsection (b) that the defendant was a bona fide 9purchaser for value who did not know, or have reason to know, 10that the property was stolen. 11    (720 ILCS 5/21.4-6 new)12    Sec. 21.4-6. Forfeiture. 13    (a) All items of personal property that are used, have 14been used, or are intended for use, in perpetration of theft or 15damage to a critical infrastructure facility are subject to 16forfeiture. This forfeiture includes all conveyances, 17including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, except that:18        (1) a conveyance used by any person as a common 19    carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier 20    may not be forfeited under this Section unless it appears 21    that the person owning the conveyance is a consenting 22    party or privy to a violation of this Article;23        (2) a conveyance may not be forfeited under the 24    provisions of this Article if the person owning the 25    conveyance establishes that he or she neither knew nor had   HB1480- 6 -LRB104 03492 RLC 13515 b1    reason to know that the conveyance was being employed or 2    was likely to be employed in a violation of this Article; 3    or4        (3) a bona fide security interest or other valid lien 5    in any conveyance may not be forfeited under the 6    provisions of this Article, unless the State proves by a 7    preponderance of the evidence that the holder of the 8    security interest or lien either knew or had reason to 9    know that the conveyance was being used or was likely to be 10    used in a violation of this Article.11    (b) All procedures relating to the seizure and disposition 12of property subject to forfeiture under this Article shall be 13governed by the same provisions applicable to the seizure and 14disposition of property under the Drug Asset Forfeiture 15Procedure Act. 16    (720 ILCS 5/21.4-7 new)17    Sec. 21.4-7. Exceptions. The provisions of this Article do 18not apply to:19        (1) any person or organization monitoring or attentive 20    to compliance with public or worker safety laws, or, wage 21    and hour requirements;22        (2) the right to free speech or assembly, including, 23    but not limited to, protesting and picketing;24        (3) the owner of a critical infrastructure facility 25    and its affiliates, directors, officers, employees,   HB1480- 7 -LRB104 03492 RLC 13515 b1    contractors, subcontractors, or other persons affiliated 2    those persons, acting within the scope of the person's 3    employment or agency.